Hawaii statutes.
[§159-12] License required. It shall
be unlawful for any person to engage in the business of slaughtering cattle,
sheep, swine, goats, horses, mules and other equines or manufacturing or
processing of meat or meat products without a license as required by this part.
[L 1969, c 214, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next